Utah, session 2026, HB497.
Section 1. Section 53F-9-201.1 is amended to read:53F-9-201.1. Appropriations to the Minimum School Program from the Uniform School Fund.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Base budget" means the same as that term is defined in legislative rule.(b)"Enrollment growth and inflation estimates" means the cost estimates regarding enrollment growth and inflation described in Section 53F-2-208.(2)Except as provided in Subsection 53F-9-204(3), for a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2021, when preparing the Public Education Base Budget, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall include appropriations to the Minimum School Program from the Uniform School Fund, and, subject to Subsection 53F-9-204(3), the Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account, in an amount that is greater than or equal to the sum of:(a)the ongoing Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund appropriations to the Minimum School Program in the current fiscal year; and(b)subject to Subsection 53F-9-204(3)(b), :(i)enrollment growth and inflation estimates.; and(ii)for a fiscal year in which enrollment declines, to increase the value of the weighted pupil unit, as defined in Section 53F-2-102, an amount equal to a projected reduction in appropriations to the Minimum School Program from the Uniform School Fund for the given fiscal year related to a decline in student enrollment that the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst recommends to the Executive Appropriations Committee, in consultation with the state board and the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.(3)The total annual amount deposited into the Uniform School Fund, including the deposits through the distributions described in Sections 59-7-532 and 59-10-544, for a given fiscal year may not exceed the amount appropriated from the Uniform School Fund for that fiscal year.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.